Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-668
Through highway, defined.

Through highway shall mean every highway or portion thereof on which vehicular traffic is given preferential right-of-way and at the entrances to which vehicular traffic from intersecting highways is required by law to yield such right-of-way to vehicles on such highway in obedience to a stop sign, yield sign, or other traffic control device, when such sign or device is erected as provided by law.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 164.